Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1266.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "child" in section 6302 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Child." An individual who:(1) is under the age of 18 years;(2) is under the age of 21 years who committed an act of delinquency before reaching the age of 18 years; or12345678910111213141516171819 (3) is under the age of 21 years and was adjudicated dependent before reaching the age of 18 years, who has requested the court to retain jurisdiction and who remains under the jurisdiction of the court as a dependent child because the court has determined that the child is:(i) completing secondary education or an equivalent credential;(ii) enrolled in an institution which provides postsecondary or [vocational] career and technical education;(iii) participating in a program actively designed to promote or remove barriers to employment;(iv) employed for at least 80 hours per month; or(v) incapable of doing any of the activities described in subparagraph (i), (ii), (iii) or (iv) due to a medical or behavioral health condition, which is supported by regularly updated information in the permanency plan of the child. * * *Section 2. Title 42 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6312. Financial obligations imposed on child.(a) Obligation.--Except as provided in subsection (b), a child or a child's parent, guardian or custodian shall not be required to pay a fee, cost or other monetary obligation under this chapter, including for participation in a program, evaluation or service or as part of an informal adjustment, consent decree or order of disposition.(b) Exception for restitution.--Subsection (a) does not apply to restitution ordered under section 6352(a)(5) (relating to disposition of delinquent child).20260SB1266PN1578 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. Section 6352(a)(5) and (6) of Title 42 are amended to read:§ 6352. Disposition of delinquent child.(a) General rule.--If the child is found to be a delinquent child the court may make any of the following orders of disposition determined to be consistent with the protection of the public interest and best suited to the child's treatment, supervision, rehabilitation and welfare, which disposition shall, as appropriate to the individual circumstances of the child's case, provide balanced attention to the protection of the community, the imposition of accountability for offenses committed and the development of competencies to enable the child to become a responsible and productive member of the community:* * *(5) Ordering payment by the child of a reasonable [amounts] amount of money [as fines, costs, fees or] for restitution as deemed appropriate as part of the plan of rehabilitation considering the nature of the acts committed and the earning capacity of the child, including a contribution to a restitution fund and the Crime Victim Services and Compensation Fund not to exceed $50 for each fund. The president judge of the court of common pleas shall establish a restitution fund for the deposit of all contributions to the restitution fund which are received or collected. The president judge of the court of common pleas shall promulgate written guidelines for the administration of the fund. Disbursements from the fund shall be made, subject to the written guidelines and the limitations of this chapter, at the discretion of the president judge and used to 20260SB1266PN1578 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reimburse crime victims for financial losses resulting from delinquent acts. For an order made under this subsection, the court shall retain jurisdiction until there has been full compliance with the order or until the delinquent child attains 21 years of age. Any restitution order which remains unpaid at the time the child attains 21 years of age shall continue to be collectible under section 9728 (relating to collection of restitution, reparation, fees, costs, fines and penalties).(6) An order of the terms of probation may include [an] appropriate [fine considering the nature of the act committed or] restitution not in excess of actual damages caused by the child which shall be paid from the earnings of the child received through participation in a constructive program of service or education acceptable to the victim and the court whereby, during the course of such service, the child shall be paid not less than the minimum wage of this Commonwealth. In ordering such service, the court shall take into consideration the age, physical and mental capacity of the child and the service shall be designed to impress upon the child a sense of responsibility for the injuries caused to the person or property of another. The order of the court shall be limited in duration consistent with the limitations in section 6353 (relating to limitation on and change in place of commitment and disposition review hearing) and in [the act of May 13, 1915 (P.L.286, No.177), known as the Child Labor Law] the act of October 24, 2012 (P.L.1209, No.151), known as the Child Labor Act. The court order shall specify the nature of the work, the number of hours to be spent performing the assigned tasks, and shall further 20260SB1266PN1578 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 specify that as part of a plan of treatment and rehabilitation that up to 75% of the earnings of the child be used for restitution in order to provide positive reinforcement for the work performed.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1266PN1578 - 5 - 123456